District of Columbia statutes.
21-1109

Repealed

Private and public patients; bond for support and maintenance; sufficiency and justification of sureties.

Repealed.

Sept. 14, 1965, 79 Stat. 768, Pub. L. 89-183, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 568, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 159(g)(5)
Oct. 22, 1970, 84 Stat. 1087, Pub. L. 91-490, § 2(a)(2)
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-169, § 21(e)(4), 59 DCR 5567
1981 Ed., § 21-1109.
1973 Ed., § 21-1109.
Section 21-1108, referred to in the first sentence of subsection (a) of this section, was repealed by the Act of March 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-137, § 604(a)(1).
Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.